test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nusjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [нувандадав, нувндадав, нувандадув, нувндадув, нувандадами, нувандадми, нувндадами, нувндадми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [нувандадав, нувндадав, нувандадув, нувндадув, нувандадами, нувандадми, нувндадами, нувндадми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [нувандадан, нувндадан, нувандадани, нувандадни, нувндадани, нувндадни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [нувандадар, нувндадар]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [нувандадамд, нувндадамд]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [нувандаданд, нувндаданд]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [нувандадада, нувандадда, нувндадада, нувндадда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [нувандадамда, нувндадамда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [нувандаданда, нувндаданда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [нувандадами’, нувандадми’, нувндадами’, нувндадми’]
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: нув(а)ндад(а)ми
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [нувандадами’, нувандадми’, нувндадами’, нувндадми’]
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: нув(а)ндад(а)ми
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [нувандадани’, нувандадни’, нувндадани’, нувндадни’]
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: нув(а)ндад(а)ни
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [нувандадари’, нувандадри’, нувндадари’, нувндадри’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [нувандадамди’, нувндадамди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [нувандаданди’, нувндаданди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [нувандадади’, нувандадди’, нувндадади’, нувндадди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [нувандадамди’, нувндадамди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [нувандаданди’, нувндаданди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [нувандадава”, нувандадва”, нувндадава”, нувндадва”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [нувандадава”, нувандадва”, нувндадава”, нувндадва”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [нувандадана”, нувандадна”, нувндадана”, нувндадна”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [нувандадара”, нувандадра”, нувндадара”, нувндадра”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [нувандадамда”, нувндадамда”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [нувандаданда”, нувндаданда”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [нувандададо’, нувандаддо’, нувндададо’, нувндаддо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [нувандадамдо’, нувндадамдо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [нувандадандо’, нувндадандо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: [нувандадм’, нувндадм’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: [нувандан, нувндан]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: [нуванда, нувнда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: [нувандани’, нувндани’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: [нувандади’, нувндади’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: [нувандаха’, нувндаха’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: [нувандава”, нувндава”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: [нувандада”, нувндада”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: [нуванда”, нувнда”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: [нувандадамзь, нувндадамзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: [нуванданась, нувнданась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: [нувандась, нувндась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: [нуванданинзь, нувнданинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: [нувандадинзь, нувндадинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: [нувандаханзь, нувндаханзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: [нувандаваць, нувндаваць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: [нувандадаць, нувндадаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: [нувандаць, нувндаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: [нувандав, нувндав]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: [нувандар, нувндар]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: [нувандада, нувндада]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: [нувандами’, нувндами’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: [нувандари’, нувндари’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: [нувандади’, нувндади’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: [нувандава”, нувндава”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: [нувандара”, нувндара”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: [нувандадо’, нувндадо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: [нувандавась, нувндавась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: [нувандарась, нувндарась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: [нувандадась, нувндадась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: [нувандаминзь, нувндаминзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: [нувандаринзь, нувндаринзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: [нувандадинзь, нувндадинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: [нувандаваць, нувндаваць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: [нувандараць, нувндараць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: [нувандадонзь, нувндадонзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: [нувандахаюн, нувндахаюн]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: [нувандахаюд, нувндахаюд]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: [нувандахаюда, нувндахаюда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: [нувандахаюни’, нувндахаюни’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: [нувандахаюди’, нувндахаюди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: [нувандахаюди’, нувндахаюди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: [нувандахаюна”, нувндахаюна”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: [нувандахаюда”, нувндахаюда”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: [нувандахаюдо’, нувндахаюдо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: [нувандахаюнась, нувндахаюнась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: [нувандахаюдась, нувндахаюдась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: [нувандахаюдась, нувндахаюдась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: [нувандахаюнинзь, нувндахаюнинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: [нувандахаюдинзь, нувндахаюдинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: [нувандахаюдинзь, нувндахаюдинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: [нувандахаюнаць, нувндахаюнаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: [нувандахаюдаць, нувндахаюдаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: [нувандахаюдонзь, нувндахаюдонзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: [нувандин, нувндин]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: [нувандид, нувндид]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: [нувандида, нувндида]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: [нувандини’, нувндини’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: [нувандиди’, нувндиди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: [нувандиди’, нувндиди’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: [нувандина”, нувндина”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: [нувандида”, нувндида”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: [нувандидо’, нувндидо’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: [нувандинась, нувндинась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: [нувандидась, нувндидась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: [нувандидась, нувндидась]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: [нувандининзь, нувндининзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: [нувандидинзь, нувндидинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: [нувандидинзь, нувндидинзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: [нувандинаць, нувндинаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: [нувандидаць, нувндидаць]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: [нувандидонзь, нувндидонзь]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Tra: [нувандаӈэ, нувндаӈэ]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Car: [нувандаси”, нувндаси”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Equ: [нувандадрем’, нувндадрем’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut+Equ+lat: [нувандадрев’, нувндадрев’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Nom+Sg+Abs: нувдавэй
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Acc+Sg+Abs: нувдавэйм’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Gen+Sg+Abs: нувдавэй’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Dat+Sg+Abs: нувдавэн’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Loc+Sg+Abs: нувдавэхэна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Abl+Sg+Abs: нувдавэхэд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pros+Sg+Abs: нувдавэвна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Nom+Du+Abs: нувдавэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Acc+Du+Abs: нувдавэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Gen+Du+Abs: нувдавэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Nom+Pl+Abs: нувдавэй”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Acc+Pl+Abs: нувдавэй
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Gen+Pl+Abs: нувдавэй”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Dat+Pl+Abs: нувдавэхэ”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Loc+Pl+Abs: нувдавэхэ”на
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Abl+Pl+Abs: нувдавэхэт
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pros+Pl+Abs: нувдавэй”мана
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [нувдавэв, нувдавэми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [нувдавэв, нувдавэми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [нувдавэн, нувдавэни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэн, нувдавэхэни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэнан, нувдавэхэнани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэдан, нувдавэхэдани, нувдавэхэдни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [нувдавэвнан, нувдавэвнани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэюн, нувдавэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэюн, нувдавэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэюн, нувдавэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [нувдавэян, нувдавэйни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [нувдавэян, нувдавэйни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [нувдавэя”н, нувдавэй”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэ”н, нувдавэхэ”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэ”нан, нувдавэхэ”нани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [нувдавэхэтан, нувдавэхэтани, нувдавэхэтни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [нувдавэй”манан, нувдавэй”манани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нувдавэр
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нувдавэмд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нувдавэнд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нувдавэхэнд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: нувдавэхэнанд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нувдавэхэданд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: нувдавэвнанд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Nom+PxSg2: нувдавэхэюд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Acc+PxSg2: нувдавэхэюд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Gen+PxSg2: нувдавэхэют
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нувдавэяд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нувдавэяд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нувдавэят
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нувдавэхэт
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: нувдавэхэ”нат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нувдавэхэтат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: нувдавэй”манат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нувдавэда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нувдавэмда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нувдавэнда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нувдавэхэнда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: нувдавэхэнанда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нувдавэхэданда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: нувдавэвнанда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Nom+PxSg3: нувдавэхэюда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Acc+PxSg3: нувдавэхэюда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Gen+PxSg3: нувдавэхэюта
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нувдавэйда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нувдавэйда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нувдавэйта
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нувдавэхэта
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: нувдавэхэ”ната
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [нувдавэхэтата, нувдавэхэтта]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: нувдавэй”маната
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: нувдавэми’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: нувдавэми
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: нувдавэми’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: нувдавэми
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: нувдавэни’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: нувдавэни
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: нувдавэхэни’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: нувдавэхэни
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: нувдавэхэнани’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: нувдавэхэнани
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [нувдавэхэдани’, нувдавэхэдни’]
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [нувдавэхэдани, нувдавэхэдни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: нувдавэвнани’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: нувдавэвнани
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg+Du+Nom+PxDu1: нувдавэхэюни’
